Illinois, session 104th, HB4943.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Recyclable Metal Purchase Registration Law 5is amended by changing Sections 2, 4.1, and 4.3 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 325/2)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 322)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. When used in this Act:8    "Burned wire" means any coated metal wire that has been 9smelted, burned, or melted, thereby removing the protective 10coating or the manufacturer's or owner's identifying marks. 11    "Catalytic converter" means a post-combustion device that 12oxidizes hydrocarbons and carbon monoxide gases or reduces 13oxides of nitrogen and that is designed or intended for use as 14part of an emission control system. As used in this Section, 15"catalytic converter" includes nonferrous parts, including 16rhodium, platinum, and palladium.17    "Detached catalytic converter" means a catalytic converter 18that was previously installed on a motor vehicle and 19subsequently removed. 20    "Recyclable metal" means any copper, brass, or aluminum, 21or any combination of those metals, or any catalytic converter 22or its contents purchased by a recyclable metal dealer, 23irrespective of form or quantity, except that "recyclable   HB4943 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19459 RLC 32907 b1metal" does not include: (i) items designed to contain, or to 2be used in the preparation of, beverages or food for human 3consumption; (ii) discarded items of non-commercial or 4household waste; (iii) gold, silver, platinum, and other 5precious metals used in jewelry; or (iv) vehicles, junk 6vehicles, vehicle cowls, or essential vehicle parts. 7"Recyclable metal" includes copper, brass, aluminum, or any 8combination of those metals found in telecommunications wire 9or in any other equipment used to provide (i) 10telecommunications services, as described in Section 13-203 of 11the Public Utilities Act, or (ii) broadband service, 12interconnected VoIP services, or wireless services, as 13described in Section 13-804 of the Public Utilities Act. 14    "Recyclable metal dealer" means any individual, firm, 15corporation or partnership conducting activity within the 16boundaries of the State of Illinois and engaged in the 17business of purchasing and reselling recyclable metal either 18at a permanently established place of business or in 19connection with a business of an itinerant nature, including 20junk shops, junk yards, or junk stores, except that 21"recyclable metal dealer" does not include automotive parts 22recyclers, scrap processors, repairers and rebuilders licensed 23pursuant to Section 5-301 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 24Recyclable metal dealers shall not be engaged in the business 25of purchasing or reselling vehicles, junk vehicles, vehicle 26cowls, or essential vehicle parts.  HB4943 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19459 RLC 32907 b1    "Telecommunications wire" means (i) wire used in a 2wireline communications network facility or (ii) wire used in 3a wireless communications network facility, fiber, copper 4cable sheathed, or twisted-pair wire without sheathing. 5"Telecommunications wire" includes tower, antennae, bus bar, 6copper ground support structures, burned wire, and all 7associated aerial or ground-based cable lines or equipment 8used as part of a wireline or wireless telecommunications or 9broadband network. 10(Source: P.A. 102-906, eff. 5-27-22; 103-677, eff. 1-1-25.) 11    (815 ILCS 325/4.1)12    Sec. 4.1. Restricted purchases.13    (a) It is a violation of this Act for any person to 14possess, purchase, attempt to purchase, sell or attempt to 15sell, or for any recyclable metal dealer to purchase or 16attempt to purchase, any of the following:17        (1) materials that are clearly marked as property 18    belonging to a business or someone else other than the 19    seller;20        (2) property associated with use by governments, 21    utilities, or railroads including, but not limited to, 22    guardrails, manhole covers, electric transmission and 23    distribution equipment, including transformers, grounding 24    straps, wires or poles, historical markers, street signs, 25    traffic signs, sewer grates, or any rail, switch   HB4943 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19459 RLC 32907 b1    component, spike, angle bar, tie plate, or bolt of the 2    type used in constructing railroad track;3        (3) cemetery plaques or ornaments; or4        (4) any catalytic converter or its contents not 5    attached to a motor vehicle at the time of the transaction 6    unless the seller is licensed as an automotive parts 7    recycler or scrap processor; or . 8        (5) telecommunications wire in any amount unless the 9    seller is an authorized agent, a representative, an 10    employee, or a licensed contractor of a public utility, a 11    provider of telecommunications services as described in 12    Section 13-203 of the Public Utilities Act, or a provider 13    of broadband service, interconnected VoIP services, or 14    wireless services as described in Section 13-804 of the 15    Public Utilities Act. 16    (b) (Blank).17(Source: P.A. 102-906, eff. 5-27-22; 103-677, eff. 1-1-25.) 18    (815 ILCS 325/4.3)19    Sec. 4.3. Purchases of copper and telecommunications wire. 20A recyclable metal dealer shall not pay cash in payment for any 21copper, including copper tubing or wiring, or 22telecommunications wire having a value of $100 or more. 23Payment for these materials must be made as follows:24        (1) by check or money order;25        (2) the payee on the check or money order shall be the   HB4943 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19459 RLC 32907 b1    same person as the seller who conducted the transaction;2        (3) if the seller is a business, then the recyclable 3    metal dealer shall make the check or money order payable 4    to the company, and not to any individual employee or 5    agent of the company. 6(Source: P.A. 97-923, eff. 1-1-13.)